Utah statutes.
53-9-121.   Limited-use license.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Legislative body" means:

(i)  the Legislature;

(ii)  the Utah House of Representatives;

(iii)  the Utah Senate;

(iv)  a special investigative committee; or

(v)  a staff office of the Legislature.

(b)  "Special investigative committee" is as defined in Subsection 36-12-9(1).

(2)  Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, a person is qualified to receive a limited-use license if the person:

(a)  is licensed, in good standing, by another state, district, or territory of the United States to provide the services of a private investigator or private detective; and

(b)  is retained by a legislative body to provide the services of a private investigator or private detective for:

(i)  a special investigative committee; or

(ii)  a purpose relating to impeachment.

(3)  A person holding a limited-use license may only provide the services described in Subsection (2)(b).

(4)  The bureau shall issue a limited-use license to a person within five days after the day on which the bureau receives notice from a legislative body that:

(a)  the person meets the qualifications described in Subsection (2)(a); and

(b)  the legislative body has retained the person to provide the services described in Subsection (2)(b).

(5)  The bureau may not:

(a)  impose a qualification for the receipt of a limited-use license other than the qualifications described in Subsection (2)(a); or

(b)  charge a fee to issue a limited-use license.

(6)  A limited-use license expires when the person to whom it is issued is no longer retained by a legislative body to provide a service described in Subsection (2)(b).



Enacted by Chapter 3, 2013 Special Session 1

